Wisconsin, session 2025, AB974.
do enact as follows:AB974,11Section 1. 16.004 (22) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 2is repealed.AB974,23Section 2. 16.004 (22m) of the statutes is created to read:AB974,2,5416.004 (22m) Grants for WisconsinEye. (a) In this subsection, 5“WisconsinEye” means the WisconsinEye Public Affairs Network, Inc.AB974,2,106(b) From the appropriation under s. 20.505 (1) (t), the secretary shall make 7payments in the form of a grant to WisconsinEye to be used for WisconsinEye’s 8operating costs to broadcast live state government proceedings, news conferences, 9and civic events and to maintain and provide free online public access to unedited 10digital archives of the broadcasts.AB974,2,1211(c) As a condition for receiving any payment under par. (b), WisconsinEye 12shall meet all of the following requirements:AB974,3,2131. Appoint to its board of directors one designee each of the speaker of the 14assembly, minority leader of the assembly, majority leader of the senate, and 1minority leader of the senate, except that no designee under this subdivision may be 2a member of the legislature.AB974,3,432. Focus its coverage primarily on official state government meetings and 4business.AB974,3,653. Provide online public access, on a continuous basis, to WisconsinEye’s live 6broadcasts and digital archives without any charge.AB974,3,974. Submit an annual financial report to the chief clerk of each house of the 8legislature for distribution to the legislature under s. 13.172 (2) and to the joint 9committee on finance.AB974,3,1110(d) If, after a payment under par. (b), WisconsinEye ceases operations and 11divests its assets, WisconsinEye shall do all of the following:AB974,3,13121. Pay to the secretary for deposit into the general fund an amount equal to 13the total amount paid under par. (b).AB974,3,14142. Transfer all of the WisconsinEye archives to the state historical society.AB974,315Section 3. 20.505 (1) (t) of the statutes is created to read:AB974,3,181620.505 (1) (t) Grants to WisconsinEye. All moneys received as interest 17earnings of the public affairs network fund to make grants to the WisconsinEye 18Public Affairs Network, Inc., under s. 16.004 (22m).AB974,419Section 4. 20.855 (4) (dt) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 2015, is repealed.AB974,521Section 5. 25.17 (1) (m) of the statutes is created to read:AB974,3,222225.17 (1) (m) Public affairs network fund (s. 25.79);AB974,623Section 6. 25.79 of the statutes is created to read:AB974,4,22425.79 Public affairs network fund. There is established a separate 1nonlapsible trust fund designated as the public affairs network fund, to consist of 2all of the following:AB974,4,33(1) All appropriations and transfers of state funds to the fund. AB974,4,44(2) All donations, gifts, and bequests made to the fund.AB974,4,55(3) All income and interest earned by the fund.AB974,76Section 7. Nonstatutory provisions.AB974,4,97(1) No later than 30 days after the effective date of this subsection, the 8secretary of administration shall transfer any unencumbered balance in s. 20.855 9(4) (dt) to the public affairs network fund under s. 25.79.AB974,810Section 8. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 11publication, except as follows:AB974,4,1312(1) The treatment of s. 20.855 (4) (dt) takes effect on the day after the 13secretary of administration transfers funds pursuant to Section 7 (1) of this act.AB974,4,1414